apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="মেলা__adj">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="pl" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>গুলা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="pl" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="pl" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="কিপটা__adj">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ফেরতা__adj">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--Pronoun-->

    <pardef n="ম/ুই__prn">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>োর</l>
          <r> ুই <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>োক</l>
          <r> ুই <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="হা/রা__prn">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r>মার <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>মরা</l>
          <r>রা <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>মাক</l>
          <r>রা <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="তোমা/ক__prn">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="fam" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>ঘরের</l>
          <r>ক <s n="prn" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="aa" />
            <s n="mf" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="fam" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!--Postpositions-->

    <pardef n="থেকি__post">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="post" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="গোরত__post">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="post" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নিবা__post">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="post" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!--Numerals-->
    <pardef n="দু__num">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
            <s n="an" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n = "enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n = "enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>জন</l>
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
            <s n="hu" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n = "enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

     <e lm="ফেরতা">
       <i>ফেরতা</i>
       <par n="ফেরতা__adj" />
     </e>
     <e lm="মেলা">
       <i>মেলা</i>
       <par n="মেলা__adj" />
     </e>
     <e lm="কিপটা">
       <i>কিপটা</i>
       <par n="কিপটা__adj" />
     </e>
     <e lm="মুই">
       <i>ম</i>
       <par n="ম/ুই__prn" />
     </e>
     <e lm="হারা">
       <i>হা</i>
       <par n="হা/রা__prn" />
     </e>
     <e lm="তোমাক">
       <i>তোমা</i>
       <par n="তোমা/ক__prn" />
     </e>
     <e lm="গোরত">
       <i>গোরত</i>
       <par n="গোরত__post" />
     </e>
     <e lm="নিবা">
       <i>নিবা</i>
       <par n="গোরত__post" />
     </e>
     <e lm="থেকি">
       <i>থেকি</i>
       <par n="গোরত__post" />
     </e>
     <e lm="দু">
       <i>দু</i>
       <par n="দু__num" />
     </e>
     <e lm="বত্রিশ">
       <i>বত্রিশ</i>
       <par n="দু__num" />
     </e>
